District of Columbia statutes.
8-1534

Recyclable and compostable food service ware list.

No later than 180 days after December 17, 2014, the Mayor shall make public a list of vendors offering compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware products. The Mayor shall update this list annually for at least 5 years after it is first published.

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 404, 61 DCR 8045
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6172(d), 62 DCR 10905

History

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “vendors offering compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware products” for “vendors offering affordable compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware products.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6172(d) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-142, § 502(g), see § 6172(g) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(g) of D.C. Law 20-142, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, § 6172(g), provided that §§ 403 and 404 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2015.

Editor's Notes